South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4775.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-1-520.  (A) A driver's license issued by another state exclusively to undocumented immigrants who are unable to prove lawful presence in the United States when the license was issued, is invalid in this State and does not authorize the holder to drive a motor vehicle in this State. These drivers' licenses include licenses that are issued exclusively to undocumented immigrants or licenses that are substantially the same as licenses issued to citizens, residents, or those lawfully present in the United States, but have markings establishing that the license holder did not exercise the option of providing proof of lawful presence. (B) A law enforcement officer who stops a person driving with an invalid license described in subsection (A) shall issue a citation to the driver for driving without a license in violation of Section 56-1-440. (C) The department, to facilitate the enforcement of this section and to aid in providing notice to the public and visitors of invalid licenses, shall maintain on its website a list of out-of-state classes of drivers' licenses that are invalid in this State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----